en: Magnet Toys
xx: Magnet Toys
cs: Magnetické hračky
da: Magnetisk legetøj
de: Magnetspielzeug
es: Juguetes magnéticos
fr: Jouets aimantés
it: Giocattoli magnetici
ja: マグネット式おもちゃ
nl: Magnetisch speelgoed
no: Magnetleker
pl: Zabawki magnetyczne
pt: Brinquedos com ímãs
ru: Магнитные игрушки
sv: Magnetleksaker
tr: Mıknatıslı Oyuncaklar

en: Flying Toy Accessories
xx: Flying Toy Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k létajícím hračkám
da: Tilbehør til flyvende legetøj
de: Zubehör für Flugspielzeug
es: Accesorios para juguetes voladores
fr: Accessoires pour jouets volants
it: Accessori per giocattoli volanti
ja: 飛行玩具関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor vliegend speelgoed
no: Tilbehør til flyvende leker
pl: Akcesoria do zabawek latających
pt: Acessórios para brinquedos que voam
ru: Принадлежности для летающих игрушек
sv: Tillbehör till flygande leksaker
tr: Uçan Oyuncak Aksesuarları

en: Kite Accessories
xx: Kite Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k drakům
da: Tilbehør til drager
de: Zubehör für Drachen
es: Accesorios para cometas
fr: Accessoires pour cerfs-volants
it: Accessori per aquiloni
ja: 凧・カイト関連用品
nl: Vliegeraccessoires
no: Dragetilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do latawców
pt: Acessórios para pipas
ru: Принадлежности для воздушных змеев
sv: Draktillbehör
tr: Uçurtma Aksesuarları

en: Kite Line Reels & Winders
xx: Kite Line Reels & Winders
cs: Cívky a navíječky na pouštění draků
da: Hjul og spoler til drageliner
de: Wickelspulen für Drachen
es: Bobinas y carretes para cometas
fr: Enrouleurs et dévidoirs pour cerfs-volants
it: Bobine e spolette per fili per aquiloni
ja: 凧・カイト用リール
nl: Haspels en spoelen voor vliegerlijn
no: Spoler og hjul for dragesnorer
pl: Kołowrotki i nawijarki do latawców
pt: Carretéis e enroladores de linha para pipas
ru: Лебёдки для воздушных змеев
sv: Linspolar och vindor för drakar
tr: Uçurtma İp Makaraları ve Sarıcıları

en: Flying Toys
xx: Flying Toys
cs: Létací hračky
da: Flyvende legetøj
de: Fliegendes Spielzeug
es: Juguetes voladores
fr: Jouets volants
it: Giocattoli volanti
ja: 飛行玩具
nl: Vliegend speelgoed
no: Flygende leker
pl: Zabawki latające
pt: Brinquedos voadores
ru: Летающие игрушки
sv: Flygande leksaker
tr: Uçan Oyuncaklar

en: Air & Water Rockets
xx: Air & Water Rockets
cs: Vzdušné a vodní rakety
da: Vand- og luftraketter
de: Luft- & Wasserraketen
es: Cohetes de agua y aire
fr: Fusées à air et à eau
it: Razzi ad aria e acqua
ja: エアロケット・ウォーターロケット
nl: Lucht- en waterraketten
no: Luft- og vannraketter
pl: Rakiety powietrzne i wodne
pt: Foguetes de ar e água
ru: Воздушно-водяные ракеты
sv: Luft- och vattenraketer
tr: Hava ve Su Roketleri

en: Kites
xx: Kites
cs: Draci
da: Drager
de: Drachen
es: Cometas
fr: Cerfs-volants
it: Acquiloni
ja: 凧・カイト
nl: Vliegers
no: Drager
pl: Latawce
pt: Pipas
ru: Воздушные змеи
sv: Drakar
tr: Uçurtmalar

en: Toy Gliders
xx: Toy Gliders
cs: Modely kluzáků
da: Legetøjssvæveflyver
de: Spielzeug-Segelflugzeuge
es: Planeadores de juguete
fr: Planeurs
it: Alianti giocattolo
ja: おもちゃのグライダー
nl: Zweefvliegtuigjes
no: Leke-seilfly
pl: Szybowce
pt: Planadores de brinquedo
ru: Игрушечные планеры
sv: Leksaksglidplan
tr: Oyuncak Planörler

en: Toy Parachutes
xx: Toy Parachutes
cs: Padákové hračky
da: Legetøjsfaldskærme
de: Spielzeug-Fallschirme
es: Paracaidistas de juguete
fr: Jouets parachutes
it: Giocattoli da lancio con paracadute
ja: おもちゃのパラシュート
nl: Speelgoedparachutes
no: Lekefallskjermer
pl: Spadochrony zabawkowe
pt: Paraquedas de brinquedo
ru: Игрушечные парашюты
sv: Leksaksfallskärmar
tr: Oyuncak Paraşütler

en: Musical Toys
xx: Musical Toys
cs: Hudební hračky
da: Musiklegetøj
de: Musikspielzeuge
es: Juguetes musicales
fr: Jouets musicaux
it: Giocattoli musicali
ja: 音楽玩具
nl: Muziekspeelgoed
no: Musikkleker
pl: Zabawki muzyczne
pt: Brinquedos musicais
ru: Музыкальные игрушки
sv: Musikleksaker
tr: Müzikli Oyuncaklar

en: Toy Instruments
xx: Toy Instruments
cs: Hrací nářadí
da: Legetøjsinstrumenter
de: Spielzeuginstrumente
es: Instrumentos de juguete
fr: Instruments de jeu, Instrument de musique jouet
it: Strumenti giocattolo
ja: おもちゃの楽器
nl: Speelgoedinstrumenten
no: Lekeinstrumenter
pl: Instrumenty dla dzieci
pt: Instrumentos musicais de brinquedo
ru: Игрушечные музыкальные инструменты
sv: Leksaksinstrument
tr: Oyuncak Enstrümanlar

en: Play Vehicle Accessories
xx: Play Vehicle Accessories
cs: Auta na hraní – příslušenství
da: Legetøjskøretøj – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Spielzeugfahrzeuge
es: Accesorios para vehículos de juguete
fr: Accessoires pour véhicules de jeu
it: Accessori per veicoli giocattolo
ja: おもちゃの乗り物関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor speelvoertuigen
no: Tilbehør til lekekjøretøyer
pl: Akcesoria do pojazdów do zabawy
pt: Acessórios para veículos de brinquedo
ru: Принадлежности для детских автомобилей
sv: Tillbehör till leksaksfordon
tr: Oyuncak Taşıt Aksesuarları

en: Toy Race Car & Track Accessories
xx: Toy Race Car & Track Accessories
cs: Závodní autíčka – příslušenství
da: Legetøjsracerbil – tilbehør
de: Autorennbahn-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para coches de carreras de juguete
fr: Accessoires pour voitures de course jouets
it: Accessori per auto da corsa giocattolo
ja: おもちゃのレーシングカー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor speelgoedraceauto's
no: Tilbehør til lekeracerbiler
pl: Akcesoria do wyścigówek
pt: Acessórios para carros de corrida de brinquedo
ru: Принадлежности для игрушечных гоночных автомобилей
sv: Tillbehör till leksaksracerbilar
tr: Oyuncak Yarış Arabası Aksesuarları

en: Toy Train Accessories
xx: Toy Train Accessories
cs: Vláčky – příslušenství
da: Legetøjstog – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Spielzeugeisenbahn
es: Accesorios para trenes de juguete
fr: Accessoires pour trains jouets
it: Accessori trenini
ja: おもちゃの電車関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor speelgoedtrein
no: Tilbehør til leketog
pl: Akcesoria do kolejek
pt: Acessórios para trem de brinquedo
ru: Принадлежности для игрушечной железной дороги
sv: Tillbehör till leksakståg
tr: Oyuncak Tren Aksesuarları

en: Play Vehicles
xx: Play Vehicles
cs: Auta na hraní
da: Legetøjskøretøjer
de: Spielzeugfahrzeuge
es: Vehículos para jugar
fr: Véhicules de jeu
it: Veicoli giocattolo
ja: おもちゃの乗り物
nl: Speelgoedvoertuigen
no: Lekekjøretøyer
pl: Pojazdy do zabawy
pt: Veículos de brinquedo
ru: Игрушечные транспортные средства
sv: Leksaksfordon
tr: Oyuncak Taşıtlar

en: Toy Airplanes
xx: Toy Airplanes
cs: Letadélka na hraní
da: Legetøjsfly
de: Spielzeugflugzeuge
es: Aviones de juguete
fr: Avions jouets
it: Aerei giocattolo
ja: おもちゃの飛行機
nl: Speelgoedvliegtuigen
no: Lekefly
pl: Samoloty do zabawy
pt: Aviões de brinquedo
ru: Игрушечные самолеты
sv: Leksaksflygplan
tr: Oyuncak Uçaklar

en: Toy Boats
xx: Toy Boats
cs: Lodičky na hraní
da: Legetøjsbåde
de: Spielzeugboote
es: Barcos de juguete
fr: Bateaux jouets
it: Barche giocattolo
ja: おもちゃのボート
nl: Speelgoedboten
no: Lekebåter
pl: Łodzie
pt: Barcos de brinquedo
ru: Игрушечные лодки
sv: Leksaksbåtar
tr: Oyuncak Tekneler

en: Toy Cars
xx: Toy Cars
cs: Autíčka na hraní
da: Legetøjsbiler
de: Spielzeugautos
es: Coches de juguete
fr: Voitures jouets, Voiture de course électrique (jouet)
it: Automobili giocattolo
ja: おもちゃの自動車
nl: Speelgoedauto's
no: Lekebiler
pl: Samochody
pt: Carros de brinquedo
ru: Игрушечные машины
sv: Leksaksbilar
tr: Oyuncak Arabalar

en: Toy Helicopters
xx: Toy Helicopters
cs: Helikoptéry na hraní
da: Legetøjshelikoptere
de: Spielzeughubschrauber
es: Helicópteros de juguete
fr: Hélicoptères jouets
it: Elicotteri giocattolo
ja: おもちゃのヘリコプター
nl: Speelgoedhelikopters
no: Lekehelikoptre
pl: Helikoptery
pt: Helicópteros de brinquedo
ru: Игрушечные вертолеты
sv: Leksakshelikoptrar
tr: Oyuncak Helikopterler

en: Toy Motorcycles
xx: Toy Motorcycles
cs: Motocykly na hraní
da: Legetøjsmotorcykler
de: Spielzeugmotorräder
es: Motocicletas de juguete
fr: Motocyclettes jouets
it: Moto giocattolo
ja: おもちゃのオートバイ
nl: Speelgoedmotoren
no: Lekemotorsykler
pl: Motocykle do zabawy
pt: Motocicletas de brinquedo
ru: Игрушечные мотоциклы
sv: Leksaksmotorcyklar
tr: Oyuncak Motosikletler